Arkansas, session 2025, SB98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-4-107 is amended to read as follows:
3-4-107. Delivery of alcoholic beverages.
(a) The following permit holders may deliver or cause to be delivered
alcoholic beverages directly to the private residence of a consumer twenty-
one (21) years of age or older in a wet county or territorial subdivision
during legal operating hours provided the retail permit holder is open to the
public for a minimum of thirty (30) hours per week for retail:
(1) Retail liquor;
(2) Microbrewery-restaurant; and
(3) Small brewery;
(4) Grocery store off-premises wine;
(5) Small farm wine convenience store; and
*CRH088*
02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/10/25 SB98
(6) Off-premises retail beer.
(b) The permit holder authorized under subsection (a) of this section
shall not may deliver or cause to be delivered alcoholic beverages to an a
wet area outside inside of the county in which the permitted business is
located or in a wet area of an adjoining county.
(c) Alcoholic beverages shall be delivered by an employee of the
permit holder and shall not be delivered through a third-party delivery
system or by an employee or independent contractor of the holder of a third-
party delivery permit.
(d) An employee or independent contractor of a permit holder
authorized in subsection (a) of this section is authorized to:
(1) Carry alcoholic beverages to a customer's vehicle within the
permit holder's parking lot or designated pick-up area; and
(2) Complete the sale of the alcoholic beverages within the
parking lot or designated pick-up area by verifying that the customer is
twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 3, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 11 — Third-party Delivery Permits

3-4-1101. Third-party delivery permits generally.
(a) An individual, a limited liability company, a corporation, or a
partnership registered to do business in this state, regardless of the
residence of the ownership of the entity, may apply to the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Division for a third-party delivery permit.
(b) A third-party delivery permit shall not be issued to the holder of
a permit in the manufacturing or wholesale tier of the alcoholic beverage
industry.
(c) A holder of a third-party delivery permit may contract with or
employ a driver for the delivery of an alcoholic beverage from the premises
of the holder of a retailer’s permit described by § 3-4-107(a) to a consumer
located in an area where the sale of the alcoholic beverage is legal.
(d) A holder of a third-party delivery permit may contract with or
employ a person to make a delivery under this subchapter who:
(1) Is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/10/25 SB98
(2) Holds a valid driver’s license; and
(3) Has not been convicted of a felony.
(e) In order to receive a third-party delivery permit, an applicant
shall submit to the division an outline of internal or external training for
delivery drivers that addresses topics including identifying underage
persons, intoxicated persons, and fake or altered identification.
(f) The division shall charge an annual fee of five hundred dollars
($500) for a third-party delivery permit to be paid to and retained by the
division.
(g) The division may promulgate rules to implement the third-party
delivery permit.

3-4-1102. Determination of delivery area.
(a) In determining whether the sale of an alcoholic beverage is legal
in an area for delivery under § 3-4-1101, a holder of a third-party delivery
permit or a delivery driver employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf
of the holder of a third-party delivery permit may consult a map or other
publicly available information produced by the Alcoholic Beverage Control
Division for the purpose of establishing where the sale of alcoholic
beverages is legal.
(b) The holder of a third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver
employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-
party delivery permit may make deliveries of alcoholic beverages only in:
(1) Response to a bona fide order placed by a consumer who is
twenty-one (21) years of age or older; and
(2) An area where the sale of alcoholic beverages is legal in:
(A) The county in which the premises of the retailer
making the sale is located if the county is a wet area; or
(B) An adjoining county in which the premises of the
retailer is located if the county is a wet area.

3-4-1103. Delivery of alcoholic beverages to a consumer.
(a) A holder of a third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver
employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-
party delivery permit shall only deliver an alcoholic beverage to a person
who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older after the person accepting the
02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/10/25 SB98
delivery presents valid proof of identity and age.
(b) A holder of a third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver
employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-
party delivery permit shall not deliver an alcoholic beverage to a person
other than:
(1) The person who purchased the beverage if the person is
twenty-one (21) years of age or older; or
(2) A person within the household or place of employment of the
delivery if the recipient is twenty-one (21) years of age or older.
(c) A holder of a third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver
employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-
party delivery permit may deliver an alcoholic beverage under this subchapter
outside the hours of operation of the retailer from which the delivery is
being made only if the holder of a third-party delivery permit or the
delivery driver employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the
holder of a third-party delivery permit:
(1) Receives the alcoholic beverage from the retailer during the
retailer’s hours of legal sale; and
(2) Completes the delivery to the consumer within a reasonable
amount of time after leaving the retailer’s premises.

3-4-1104. Responsibilities of retailers.
(a) A retailer’s responsibilities regarding delivery of an alcoholic
beverage to a consumer are considered satisfied at the time the retailer
transfers possession of an alcoholic beverage to a:
(1) Holder of a third-party delivery permit; or
(2) Delivery driver employed by, contracted with, or acting on
behalf of the holder of a third-party delivery permit.
(b) An action by a holder of a third-party delivery permit or delivery
driver employed by, contracted with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a
third-party delivery permit is not attributable to the retailer with regard
to:
(1) Providing, selling, or serving alcoholic beverages to a
minor or to an intoxicated individual;
(2) The delivery of alcoholic beverages in a dry or otherwise
illegal area, unless the retailer has contractually agreed to retain
02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/10/25 SB98
responsibility for ensuring that deliveries are not directed to a dry or
otherwise illegal area; or
(3) Any other provision of the law.
(c) A retailer is not required to verify that a holder of a third-
party delivery permit or delivery driver employed by, contracted with, or
acting on behalf of the holder of a third-party delivery permit has received
delivery driver training under § 3-4-1106.
(d) A retailer shall not be held liable the actions of a holder of a
third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver employed by, contracted
with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-party delivery permit.

3-4-1105. Responsibilities of holders of third-party delivery permits.
The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may enforce the requirements of
this subchapter by the same administrative proceedings that apply to all
other alcoholic beverage permittees for a violation of the alcoholic beverage
control rules or laws of the state, including without limitation the
authority to fine the holder of the third-party delivery permit or suspend or
revoke the third-party delivery permit for violations by the holder of a
third-party delivery permit or a delivery driver employed by, contracted
with, or acting on behalf of the holder of a third-party delivery permit.

3-4-1106. Delivery training program.
(a) The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall approve an alcohol
delivery training program of an applicant for a third-party delivery permit
before the third-party delivery permit is issued.
(b) An approved alcohol delivery training program under subsection (a)
of this section may be a training program provided by a third party.
(c) The approved training program under subsection (a) of this section
shall cover:
(1) Detecting noticeable signs of intoxication;
(2) Identifying valid in-state and out-of-state government
issued identification; and
(3) Training on wet territories and dry territories of this
state.
(d) A delivery employee or independent contractor of the holder of a
third-party delivery permit shall:
02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088

As Engrossed: S1/29/25 S2/10/25 SB98
(1) Complete an approved training program under subsection (a)
of this section before making his or her first delivery; and
(2) Repeat the approved training program at least once every
twelve (12) months.

/s/B. Davis






























02-10-2025 11:13:51 CRH088